Utah statutes.
78A-7-213.   Trial facilities -- Hours of business.

(1)  A justice court judge shall conduct all official court business in a courtroom or office located in a public facility which is conducive and appropriate to the administration of justice.

(2) (a)  A county justice court may, at the direction of the county legislative body, hold justice court anywhere in the county as needed but may only hear cases arising within its precinct.

(b)  A municipal justice court judge shall hold court in the municipality where the court is located.

(c)  Justice courts may also hold court or conduct hearings or court business in any facility or location authorized by rule of the Judicial Council.

(3)  Justice courts shall be open and judicial business shall be transacted:

(a)  five days per week; or

(b)  no less than four days per week for at least 11 hours per day.

(4)  The legislative body of the county, city, or town shall establish operating hours for the justice courts within the requirements of Subsection (3) and the code of judicial administration.

(5)  The hours the courts are open shall be posted conspicuously at the courts and in local public buildings.

(6)  The clerk of the court and judges of justice courts shall attend the court at regularly scheduled times.

(7)  By July 1, 2011, all justice courts shall use a common case management system and disposition reporting system as specified by the Judicial Council.

